Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 19.4 Prudence Island Low Speed Vehicles

31-19.4-1.
Prudence Island low speed vehicles.

For the purposes of this chapter, a low speed vehicle means a self-propelled, electrically or gas powered motor vehicle which: is designed to carry four (4) or fewer persons; is designed to be, and is, operated at speeds of twenty-five (25) miles per hour or less; and conforms to the maximum safety equipment requirements as adopted in the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 500, Low Speed vehicles (49 C.F.R. 571.500). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, a low speed vehicle may be operated upon the roadways of Prudence Island if it meets the requirements of this section.

Each person operating a low speed vehicle on a roadway of Prudence Island shall possess a valid driver’s license issued pursuant to §

31-10-1

.

Every operator of a low speed vehicle shall maintain financial responsibility on such low speed vehicle if the low speed vehicle is to be operated upon the roadways of Prudence Island.

Every person operating a low speed vehicle shall be granted all the rights and shall be subject to all duties applicable to the driver of any motor vehicle except as to the special regulations in this section and except as to those provisions which by their nature can have no application.

The operator of a low speed vehicle shall observe all traffic laws and local ordinances regarding the rules of the road. A low speed vehicle shall not be operated on a street or a highway with a posted speed limit greater than twenty-five (25) miles per hour. The provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit a low speed vehicle from crossing a street or highway with a posted speed limit greater than thirty-five (35) miles per hour.

No person shall operate a low speed vehicle: (1) in any careless way as to endanger the person or property of another; or (2) while under the influence of alcohol or any controlled substance. Low speed vehicles shall be manufactured and comply with the standards of the National Traffic Safety Administration Standards for low speed vehicles as set out in 49 C.F.R. 571.500, as amended.

A low speed vehicle shall only be operated during the hours of 6:00 am through 6:00 pm.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 381, § 1.